Tennessee, session 114, HB1169.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-3-115, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting:
(a) On or before June 30, 2026, and each June 30 thereafter, the council shall
submit a report regarding the status of the statewide system of care for children's mental
health and the service delivery system, as described in § 37-3-112, and the status of
children's mental health in this state.
(b) The council shall engage each state department and agency that provides or
funds services related to children's mental health to create the report to ensure that the
report provides a comprehensive overview. The report must include:
(1) A current list of state and federally funded programs addressing direct
mental health services and prevention efforts for children and youth; and
(2) Recommendations from the council related to the coordination of
service delivery between state departments or agencies, gaps in treatment
availability or service delivery, and opportunities for targeted investment,
evaluation, and system improvement.
(c) The council shall submit the report to the governor; the chief clerk of each
house of the general assembly; the commissioners of mental health and substance
abuse services, children's services, education, health, human services, and disability
and aging; and the director of TennCare.
HB1169
003294
- 1 -

SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 003294